Utah statutes.
48-2c-612 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Member removal from a series -- Effect.

(1)  Unless otherwise provided in the operating agreement, a member ceases to be associated with a series and to have the power to exercise any rights or powers of a member with respect to the series upon the assignment of all of the member's interest in the company with respect to the series.

(2)  Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement, any event under this chapter or the operating agreement that causes a member to cease to be associated with a series does not, by itself:

(a)  cause the member to cease to be associated with any other series;

(b)  terminate the continued membership of a member in the limited liability company; or

(c)  cause the termination of the series, regardless of whether the member is the last remaining member associated with the series.

